Utah statutes.
53-10-502.   Bureau duties.
The bureau:
(1)  maintains dispatch and communications services for regional public safety
consolidated communications centers;
(2)  provides facilities and acts as a public safety answering point to answer
and respond to 911 calls from a region;
(3)  provides professional emergency dispatch and communications support for
law enforcement, emergency medical, fire suppression, highway maintenance,
public works, and public safety agencies representing municipal, county,
state, and federal governments; and
(4)  coordinates incident response.
